Georgia statutes. 
Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews. - For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

36-61-4. Encouragement of private enterprise.

Statute text

(a) A municipality or county, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality or county as a whole, to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban redevelopment area by private enterprise. A municipality or county shall give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under this chapter, including: the formulation of a workable program; the approval of urban redevelopment plans consistent with the general plan for the municipality or county; the adoption and enforcement of ordinances as provided for in Code Section 36-61-11; the exercise of its zoning powers; the enforcement of other laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements; the disposition of any property acquired; and the provision of necessary public improvements.

(b) Notwithstanding anything in this chapter or other provisions of law to the contrary, and in order to give effect to the encouragement of private enterprise contemplated in this Code section, the following shall apply to contracts and agreements for surface transportation projects entered into pursuant to this chapter:

(1) In addition to other methods of procurement authorized by law, the sponsoring local government, urban redevelopment agency, or other governing body shall be authorized to utilize the procedures of this chapter to provide for the planning, design, finance, construction, acquisition, leasing, operation, and maintenance of surface transportation projects. The provisions of this chapter shall be an alternative to such other methods to be exercised at the option of each sponsoring local government or public body;

(2) One or more public bodies may participate in the consideration and implementation of a surface transportation project at the discretion of the sponsoring local government. Where more than one public body agrees to participate in the consideration or implementation of a surface transportation project, the participants may designate one or more representatives of each such participating public body, as agreed to by the sponsoring local government or the urban redevelopment agency;

(3) (A) An urban redevelopment agency designated by the sponsoring local government may evaluate a project to determine the appropriate or desirable levels of public and private participation in planning, designing, financing, constructing, operating, maintaining, or facilitating, or any combination thereof, for the execution of such project. Such urban redevelopment agency may designate a public nonprofit, private corporation, body, or entity to perform this function and to otherwise perform the activities contemplated in this Code section.

(B) A sponsoring local government or an urban redevelopment agency shall be authorized to issue, individually or in sequenced stages, written requests for expressions of interest, qualifications, or proposals, or any combination thereof, or other similar methods of procurement or solicitation. Such requests shall indicate the scope of the project, the proposed public and private financial participation in the project, including, but not limited to, the rights, responsibilities, obligations, revenue sharing features, any lease, license, availability or other payment rights, and any other allocations of interests and federal and state income tax benefits in respect of real and personal property relating to a project. Such requests shall include the factors to be used in evaluating responses, the relative importance of any applicable evaluation factors, and other contractual terms and conditions expected, including any unique capabilities or qualifications that will be required of respondents, as determined in the sole discretion of the designated representative of the sponsoring local government. Public notice of such requests shall be made at least 30 days prior to the date set for the release of said request by posting a legal notice on the websites and weekly in the legal organ of the sponsoring local government and the public body implementing the project, in substantially the same manner utilized by such public bodies in order to solicit requests for proposals, with a copy of such notice provided simultaneously to each affected public body.

(C) (i) The public body implementing the project and the sponsoring local government, with the participation of any designated representatives of other participating public bodies as determined by the sponsoring local government, may engage in individual discussions and interviews with each respondent deemed fully qualified, responsible, and suitable on the basis of initial responses and with emphasis on professional competence and ability to meet the level of private financial participation as called for in such request. Repetitive interviews may be conducted. Any such interviews shall be deemed to be a part of the procurement process.

(ii) (I) At the conclusion of the final stage, on the basis of evaluation factors published in the request and all information developed in the selection process, the public body implementing the surface transportation project, in an open and public meeting subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50, shall rank the proposals in accordance with the factors set forth in the request for proposal or invitation for bids.

(II) After ranking the proposals, the public body implementing the project shall begin negotiations with the first ranked private entity. If such public body and first ranked private entity do not reach a comprehensive agreement or interim agreement, such public body may conduct negotiations with the next ranked private entity. Such process shall continue until such public body either voluntarily abandons the process or executes a comprehensive agreement or interim agreement with a private entity. Negotiations conducted with one or more selected respondents pursuant to this Code section shall continue to be deemed an active procurement until the execution of the final, definitive agreement with the selected respondent or respondents.

(iii) The public body implementing the project shall select for approval the respondent offering the most satisfactory and advantageous contract terms for the project based upon a thorough assessment of any one or more of the following: experience and reputation with similar projects; engineering and design quality; value; projected savings during, before, or after construction; and the ability of the final project's characteristics to meet the goals of the sponsoring local government, consistent with applicable plans and programs. The fair market value of any property included as a part of the procurement may be based on the consideration of the above factors, but it shall not be less than the initial cost to obtain the property. Before making such selection, the designated representative shall consult in an open and public meeting subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50 with the representatives of any participating local governing authority, participating local authority, participating state agency, department, or authority, and affected local government. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the terms and conditions for multiple awards are included in the request, the implementing public body may award contracts to more than one respondent. Should the implementing public body determine in writing that only one respondent is fully qualified, or that one respondent is clearly more highly qualified and suitable than the other respondents under consideration, a contract may be negotiated and awarded to that respondent.

(iv) Upon approval of the selection by the implementing public body, a contract or contracts not exceeding 50 years in duration may be entered into by the urban redevelopment agency or any one or more of the participating public bodies and the selected respondent or respondents. The private financial data or financial plans which qualify as trade secrets pursuant to Code Section 10-1-761 and paragraph (34) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-18-72 provided by the respondents shall remain exempt from Code Section 50-18-72 during and after the conclusion of the related selection process.

(D) A dispute over the award of a contract under this chapter shall be resolved by the filing of a petition in the superior court of the county in which the sponsoring local government is located within 30 days of the awarding of such contract and shall be determined through the use of a special master appointed by the judge of the superior court of the county in which the sponsoring local government is located. The special master shall not be authorized to enjoin or otherwise delay or suspend the execution of the contract and any work to be performed under such contract. The decision of the special master with regard to such dispute shall be appealable for a de novo review to the superior court of the county in which the sponsoring local government is located within 30 days following the decision of the special master.

(E) Nothing in this chapter shall require the designated representatives, the sponsoring local government, the implementing public body, or any participating public body to continue negotiations or discussions arising out of any request or any other procurement initiated under the provisions of this Code section.

(F) Every public body shall be authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to assist in its evaluation of responses and to implement the purposes of this chapter; provided, however, that unsolicited proposals shall not be permitted;

(4) No public officer, employee, or member of any participating public body, with respect to contracts of such public body, or the General Assembly shall serve as an agent, lobbyist, or board member for any private entity directly or indirectly under a contract or negotiating a contract provided for by this chapter for one year after leaving his or her position as a public officer, employee, or member of the public body or the General Assembly; and

(5) Contracts entered into with a private enterprise in respect to the design, construction, operation, financing, or management of the public components of a surface transportation project shall not constitute the acquisition of property for a private use, nor shall such contracts be deemed a sale, lease, or other disposition of the related interests in property under any provisions of this chapter or other provision of applicable law, and such public components of a surface transportation project shall be deemed a public use for all purposes under applicable provisions of law, including, without limitation, Code Sections 36-61-9 and 36-61-10.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 3/SB 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 36/HB 737.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, § 5.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 58, 59.

ALR. - Validity, construction, and effect of statutes providing for urban redevelopment by private enterprise, 44 A.L.R.2d 1414.

36-61-5. Resolution of necessity prerequisite to exercise of powers.

Statute text

No municipality or county shall exercise any of the powers conferred upon municipalities and counties by this chapter until after its local governing body has adopted a resolution finding that:

(1) One or more pockets of blight exist in such municipality or county; and

(2) The rehabilitation, conservation, or redevelopment, or a combination thereof, of such area or areas is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals, or welfare of the residents of the municipality or county.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 5; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 3/HB 174.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Under this section, it is not required that any evidence or proof be taken or considered but simply that a resolution be adopted. This can only mean that the officials concerned exercise the officials' own judgment based upon what the officials know or believe and make their findings. The very nature of matters required to be found by the resolution shows them not capable of being brought under judicial determination. Allen v. City Council, 215 Ga. 778, 113 S.E.2d 621 (1960).

36-61-6. Formulation of workable program.

Statute text

For the purposes of this chapter, a municipality or county may formulate a workable program for utilizing appropriate private and public resources, including those specified in Code Section 36-61-11, to eliminate and prevent the development or spread of pockets of blight, to encourage needed urban rehabilitation, to provide for the redevelopment of pockets of blight, or to undertake such of the aforesaid activities or such other feasible municipal or county activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of such workable program. Such workable program may include, without limitation, provision for the prevention of the spread of pockets of blight into areas of the municipality or county which are free from pockets of blight, through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning, and occupancy controls and standards; the rehabilitation or conservation of pockets of blight or portions thereof by replanning, removing congestion, providing parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements, including without limitation surface transportation projects, encouraging voluntary rehabilitation, and compelling the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; and the clearance and redevelopment of pockets of blight or portions thereof.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 4/HB 174; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 4/SB 4.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, § 16.

36-61-7. Preparation of redevelopment plan; approval; modification; effect of approval.

Statute text

(a) A municipality or county shall not approve an urban redevelopment plan for an urban redevelopment area unless the governing body, by resolution, has determined such area to be a pocket of blight and designated such area as appropriate for an urban redevelopment project. Authority is vested in every municipality and county to prepare, to adopt, and to revise, from time to time, a general plan for the physical development of the municipality or county as a whole (giving due regard to the environs and metropolitan surroundings), to establish and maintain a planning commission for such purpose and related municipal and county planning activities, and to make available and to appropriate the necessary funds therefor. A municipality or county shall not acquire real property for an urban redevelopment project unless the local governing body has approved the urban redevelopment plan in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

(b) The municipality or county may itself prepare or cause to be prepared an urban redevelopment plan; alternatively, any person or agency, public or private, may submit a plan to a municipality or county.

(c) The local governing body of the municipality or county shall hold or shall cause some agency of the municipality or county to hold a public hearing on an urban redevelopment plan or a substantial modification of an approved urban redevelopment plan, after public notice thereof by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation of the municipality or county. The notice shall describe the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify the urban redevelopment area covered by the plan, and shall outline the general scope of the urban redevelopment project under consideration.

(d) Following such hearing, the local governing body may approve an urban redevelopment plan if it finds that:

(1) A feasible method exists for the relocation of families who will be displaced from the urban redevelopment area in decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations within their means and without undue hardship to such families;

(2) The urban redevelopment plan conforms to the general plan of the municipality or county as a whole; and

(3) The urban redevelopment plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality or county as a whole, for the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban redevelopment area by private enterprise.

(e) An urban redevelopment plan may be modified at any time, provided that, if modified after the lease or sale by the municipality or county of real property in the urban redevelopment project area, such modification shall be subject to such rights at law or in equity as a lessee or purchaser or his or her successor or successors in interest may be entitled to assert. Any proposed modification which will substantially change the urban redevelopment plan as previously approved by the local governing body shall be subject to the requirements of this Code section, including the requirement of a public hearing, before it may be approved.

(f) Upon the approval of an urban redevelopment plan by a municipality or county, the provisions of the plan with respect to the future use and building requirements applicable to the property covered by the plan shall be controlling with respect thereto.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 5/HB 174.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, §§ 16, 20.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 59.

36-61-8. Powers of municipalities and counties generally.

Statute text

Every municipality and every county shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers in addition to others granted in this chapter:

(1) To undertake and carry out urban redevelopment projects within its area of operation; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this chapter; and to disseminate pocket of blight clearance and urban redevelopment information;

(2) To provide, to arrange, or to contract for the furnishing or repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities, or other facilities for or in connection with an urban redevelopment project and to install, construct, and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements, provided that neither the municipality or county itself nor an urban redevelopment agency or housing authority or downtown development authority acting pursuant to an election under Code Section 36-61-17 shall provide, install, or construct any public utility of the same kind or character as an existing utility operating in the municipality or county if such existing utility is providing reasonably adequate and proper service, as determined by the Public Service Commission; and to agree to any conditions that it may deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or to compliance with labor standards in the undertaking or carrying out of an urban redevelopment project, and to include, in any contract let in connection with such a project, provisions to fulfill such conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate;

(3) Within its area of operation, to enter upon any building or property in any urban redevelopment area in order to make surveys, appraisals, soundings, or test borings, and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted; to acquire, by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real property (or personal property for its administrative purposes) together with any improvements thereon; to hold, improve, clear, or prepare for redevelopment any such property; to mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real property; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the municipality or county against any risks or hazards, and to pay premiums on any such insurance; and to enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter; provided, however, that no statutory provision with respect to the acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by public bodies shall restrict a municipality or county or other public body exercising powers under this chapter in the exercise of such functions with respect to an urban redevelopment project, unless the General Assembly shall specifically so state;

(4) To invest any urban redevelopment project funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any such funds not required for immediate disbursement in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; and to redeem such bonds as have been issued pursuant to Code Section 36-61-12 at the redemption price established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled;

(5) To borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, contributions, and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the state, county, or other public body, or from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of this chapter, and to give such security as may be required and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection therewith. A municipality or county may include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government for an urban redevelopment project such conditions imposed pursuant to federal law as the municipality or county may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter;

(6) Within their area of operation, to make or have made all plans necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and to contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out such plans and to adopt or approve, modify, and amend such plans. Such plans may include, without limitation:

(A) A general plan for the locality as a whole;

(B) Urban redevelopment plans;

(C) Plans for carrying out a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements, to include but not to be limited to making loans and grants from funds received from the federal government, as well as from funds received from the repayment of such loans and interest thereon, to persons, public or private, owning private housing for the purpose of financing the rehabilitation of such housing;

(D) Plans for the enforcement of state and local laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements; and

(E) Appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies, and other preliminary plans and work necessary to prepare for the undertaking of urban redevelopment projects.

The municipality or county is authorized to develop, test, and report methods and techniques and to carry out demonstrations and other activities for the prevention and elimination of pockets of blight and to apply for, accept, and utilize grants of funds from the federal government for such purposes;

(7) To prepare plans and provide reasonable assistance for the relocation of families displaced from an urban redevelopment area, to the extent essential for acquiring possession of and clearing such area or parts thereof to permit the carrying out of the urban redevelopment project;

(8) To appropriate such funds and make such expenditures as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to levy taxes and assessments for such purposes; to close, vacate, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; to plan or replan, zone, or rezone any part of the municipality or county or make exceptions from building regulations; and to enter into agreements, under Code Section 36-61-17, with a housing authority, a downtown development authority, or an urban redevelopment agency vested with urban redevelopment project powers, which agreements may extend for up to 50 years respecting action to be taken by such municipality or county pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter. The reasonable costs of removing, relocating, and rearranging public utility facilities within urban renewal areas may constitute a cost of carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and every municipality and county may, in their discretion, pay such reasonable costs or any portion thereof;

(9) Within their areas of operation, to organize, coordinate, and direct the administration of the provisions of this chapter as they apply to such municipality or county, in order that the objective of remedying pockets of blight and preventing the causes thereof within the municipality or county may be most effectively promoted and achieved, and to establish such new office or offices of the municipality or county or to reorganize existing offices in order to carry out such purpose most effectively; and

(10) To exercise all or any part or combination of powers granted in this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 7; Ga. L. 1963, p. 644, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 946, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 13; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 6/HB 174.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Lease of facilities to private enterprises for commercial use authorized. - Under the Urban Redevelopment Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-61-1 et seq., the city may provide facilities in connection with an urban redevelopment project, including facilities leased to private enterprises for commercial use. Nations v. Downtown Dev. Auth., 256 Ga. 158, 345 S.E.2d 581 (1986).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Loans of federal money to private housing owners not allowed. - Municipalities and counties to which the Urban Redevelopment Law applies may not, pursuant to this section, make loans or grants from moneys received from the federal government under Title I of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. § 5301 et seq.) to owners of private housing for the purpose of financing the rehabilitation of such housing. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-119.

Repair or disposal of dwellings outside redevelopment area. - Municipality may acquire, rehabilitate, and dispose of substandard residential dwellings to the housing authority when such dwellings are outside an officially declared urban redevelopment area, if such activities are designed to provide low-rent housing to persons displaced by activities within such area. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U82-28.

Repairing low-rent homes for use by persons displaced by an urban redevelopment project, though outside an officially designated urban redevelopment area, would appear to be "in connection with" that project within the meaning of paragraph (2) of O.C.G.A. § 36-61-8. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U82-28.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 58 et seq. 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1164. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1167, 1279, 1460, 1461. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2016, 2184, 2185, 2276.

ALR. - What are "prevailing wages," or the like, for purposes of state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 7 A.L.R.5th 400.

Employers subject to state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 7 A.L.R.5th 444.

36-61-9. Power of eminent domain; conditions; title acquired.

Statute text

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a municipality or county shall have the right to acquire, by exercise of the power of eminent domain, any real property which it may deem necessary for its purposes under this chapter, after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein is necessary for such purposes. A municipality or county may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided in Title 22; or it may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired, provided that no real property belonging to the municipality, the county, the state, or any political subdivision thereof may be acquired without its consent.

(b) Whenever condemnation proceedings are instituted and carried on by a municipality or county in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section or through any other method of condemnation provided by law, upon the payment by the municipality or county seeking condemnation of the amount of the award and final judgment on appeal the municipality or county shall become vested with a fee simple indefeasible title to the property to which the condemnation proceedings relate. Such payment may be offset in whole or in part by the amount of any municipal or county tax liens on the condemned property and by any existing special assessments tax liens on the condemned property, including without limitation education or special district taxes collected by the municipality or county; provided, however, that any such setoff shall be subject to any existing tax liens having higher priority pursuant to Code Section 48-2-56 and to the interest in the condemned property of any known beneficiary of a year's support pursuant to former Code Section 53-5-2 as such existed on December 31, 1997, if applicable, or Code Sections 53-3-1, 53-3-2, 53-3-4, 53-3-5, and 53-3-7; provided, further, that where the condemned property is subject to a valid deed to secure debt, such setoff shall only be allowed for tax liens which arose as a result of an assessment against such property. It is declared to be necessary, to enable such municipalities and counties to exercise their powers under this Code section, that upon the condemnation proceedings being had, the municipalities and counties shall become vested with fee simple indefeasible title to the property involved in the proceedings.

(c) Unless the property is to be acquired for the purpose of devoting it to a public use, a municipality or county may not acquire real property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section until the following conditions and requirements have been met:

(1) The municipality or county which adopted the urban redevelopment plan has approved a resolution authorizing the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the agency to acquire the property;

(2) The municipality or county shall, in writing, notify the owner of the real property proposed to be acquired of the planned rehabilitation of the property as set forth in the urban redevelopment plan for the urban redevelopment area wherein the property is located;

(3) Within 30 days after being so notified, the owner of the property shall have the option of notifying the municipality or county, in writing, of his willingness and intention to rehabilitate and maintain the property in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan. In the event of multiple ownership of the property, unanimous agreement by the owners shall be required; and the failure of any one owner to notify the municipality or county, within the time limitation specified in this paragraph, of his willingness and intention to rehabilitate and maintain the property in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan shall be deemed to be a failure to exercise the option provided in this paragraph; and

(4) The owner of the property may execute an agreement with the municipality or county to rehabilitate the property in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan. Any such agreement shall be as the municipality or county deems necessary and appropriate as to form and content; in connection therewith, the municipality or county shall have the right to require sufficient performance, payment, and completion bonds. In the event that any such owner, at any time, fails to comply with or defaults in the performance of the provisions of the agreement, such property shall no longer be subject to the agreement, the option provided by paragraph (3) of this subsection shall no longer apply, and the property may be acquired by the municipality or county by purchase or through the exercise of the power of eminent domain. In the alternative, the municipality or county may either specifically enforce the agreement, exercise any rights under any bonds which may have been required, and obtain any other legal or equitable relief as may be available to the municipality or county or, if the owner fails to exercise the option to rehabilitate the property or defaults on the agreement to rehabilitate the property, the municipality or county may implement those portions of the urban development plan with respect to such property to the extent the municipality or county deems necessary and the costs of implementing such plan shall be a lien against the property enforceable in the same manner as tax liens.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 8; Ga. L. 1971, p. 445, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 14; Ga. L. 1994, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 36; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 36/HB 142.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia real property law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 219 (1981).

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 212 (1994).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Demand that just and adequate compensation be first paid is imperative. It means that such payment covers its value at the time of taking and not its value many rental periods or years prior to the actual institution of condemnation proceedings. Housing Auth. v. Schroeder, 222 Ga. 417, 151 S.E.2d 226 (1966).

Exercise of power of eminent domain under this section must be pursuant to the formulation of an urban redevelopment plan which necessitates the acquisition of specific real property to effectuate its purposes. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980).

Qualification on right of eminent domain. - Right of the state to obtain private property for the public purpose of urban redevelopment is qualified by the requirement that the property owner must be permitted to develop the owner's land personally in accordance with the proposed plan, if the owner so desires and if the owner has the resources to do so. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980); Ward v. Housing Auth., 157 Ga. App. 825, 278 S.E.2d 715 (1981).

Requirement of specificity in urban redevelopment plan. - When, pursuant to court order, condemnee was provided with a map showing the proposed use of the condemnee's land, in conjunction with the lands of other owners, as part of a 66,600 square foot warehouse, any requirement of specificity in an urban redevelopment plan was amply satisfied by this information. Waller v. Clayton County, 200 Ga. App. 706, 409 S.E.2d 561, cert. denied, 200 Ga. App. 897, 409 S.E.2d 561 (1991).

Option of landowner to develop personally. - This section gives a private landowner the option of retaining ownership of the land and developing the land in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan when the land was to be put to a nonpublic use. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980).

Term "multiple ownership" refers to a situation when a particular parcel within the tract to be condemned is owned by more than one person, rather than to all owners of all parcels within the tract. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980).

Term "property" refers to each individual parcel within the tract to be condemned, rather than to the tract as a whole, thus extending to each parcel owner the option of retaining ownership and developing in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980).

Not applicable to conveyance of previously condemned property. - Even assuming the original condemnation proceeding was conducted pursuant to the Urban Redevelopment Law and that O.C.G.A. § 36-61-9 was applicable to it, the 2003 conveyance was not a re-taking by a municipality or county and thus the transaction was not governed by the requirements of § 36-61-9. By its terms, the statute applies to the original taking of property by eminent domain. The 2003 conveyance was, instead, a re-purposing of the property from that involved in the original taking. Darling Int'l, Inc. v. Carter, 294 Ga. 455, 754 S.E.2d 347 (2014).

Subsection (c) distinguishes between procedures to be followed in acquiring property for public use and in acquiring property for nonpublic use. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980).

Planned parking structure was to be devoted to "public use" within the meaning of subsection (c) of O.C.G.A. § 36-61-9 and therefore did not trigger the requirements of that subsection. Allright Auto Parks, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 257 Ga. 315, 357 S.E.2d 797 (1987).

Cited in Nations v. Downtown Dev. Auth., 255 Ga. 324, 338 S.E.2d 240 (1985).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 26 Am. Jur. 2d, Eminent Domain, §§ 23 et seq., 433 et seq.

ALR. - Constitutionality, construction, and application of statutes or governmental projects for improvement of housing conditions (slum clearance), 130 A.L.R. 1069; 172 A.L.R. 966.

Depreciation in value, from project for which land is condemned, as a factor in fixing compensation, 5 A.L.R.3d 901.

What constitutes "Blighted Area" within urban renewal and redevelopment statutes, 45 A.L.R.3d 1096.

Eminent domain: possibility of overcoming specific obstacles to contemplated use as element in determining existence of necessary public use, 22 A.L.R.4th 840.

36-61-10. Disposal of property in redevelopment area generally; notice and bidding procedures; exchange with veterans' organization; temporary operation of property.

Statute text
